CIK: 856982
Company Name: MERIT MEDICAL SYSTEMS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2014-03-12
Accession Number: 0000856982-14-000011


Item 1 Business. GENERAL Merit Medical Systems, Inc. is a worldwide designer, developer, manufacturer and marketer of medical devices used in a vast array of interventional and diagnostic procedures. Our mission is to provide innovative high quality products to physicians and healthcare professionals to enhance patient care and enable them to perform procedures safely and effectively. Our operations are divided into the following principal markets diagnostic and interventional cardiology, interventional radiology, interventional gastroenterology, interventional pulmonology, vascular surgery, interventional nephrology, and thoracic 1 Table of Contents surgery. We believe we have been able to introduce new products and capture significant market share because of our expertise in product design, our proprietary technology and our skills in injection and insert molding. In October 2013, we acquired from Radial Assist, LLC ("Radial Assist"), the Rad Board , Rad Board Xtra , Rad Trac and Rad Rest devices which are used for patient positioning during radial access procedures. Also in October 2013, we acquired from Datascope Corp. ("Datascope"), the Safeguard Pressure Assisted Device, which assists in obtaining and maintaining hemostasis after a femoral procedure, and the Air Band Radial Compression Device, which is indicated to assist hemostasis of the radial artery puncture site while maintaining visibility. Merit was organized in July 1987 as a Utah corporation. We also conduct our operations through a number of domestic and foreign subsidiaries. Our principal offices are located at 1600 West Merit Parkway, South Jordan, Utah, 84095, and our teleph1 number is (801) 253 1600. See Item 2 Properties. We maintain an Internet website at www.merit.com. PRODUCTS We design, develop, manufacture and market innovative products that offer a high level of quality, value and safety to our customers, as well as the patients they serve. We have devoted our attention to four primary areas diagnostic and interventional cardiology, interventional radiology, interventional gastroenterology and interventional pulmonology. Our products are also used in other clinical areas such as thoracic surgery, interventional nephrology, vascular surgery, oncology and pain management. The success of our products is enhanced by the extensive experience of our management team in the healthcare industry, our experienced direct sales force and distributors, our ability to combine and customize devices, kits, trays and procedural packs at the request of our customers, and our dedication to offering facility unique solutions in the markets we serve worldwide. Cardiology and Radiology Products Interventional cardiology and interventional radiology are specialty disciplines that use many common visualization techniques and therapeutic approaches to treat vascular disease. These shared techniques give us the opportunity to gain product line efficiencies by serving 2 distinct therapeutic needs with very similar product platforms. We recognize the unique demands of the 2 disciplines and provide very specific products to serve the unique product needs of physicians practicing in these fields. Interventional cardiology is a branch of the medical specialty of cardiology that deals specifically with the catheter based diagnosis and treatment of heart diseases. A large number of procedures that can be performed by catheterization involve the insertion of a sheath into the femoral, radial, or brachial artery. Fluoroscopy (real time moving X ray images) and computed tomography ( CT ) or 3 dimensional computer generated images are most often used to visualize the vessels and chambers of the heart during these diagnostic and interventional procedures. Percutaneous coronary interventions ( PCI ) are used to treat coronary atherosclerosis and the resulting narrowing of the arteries of the heart. Interventional radiology is related to the minimally invasive treatment of disease in peripheral vessels and organs of the body. Percutaneous peripheral interventions ( PPI ) are used to treat peripheral vascular disease conditions outside the heart. Vascular Access Products and Accessories. We offer a broad line of devices used to gain and maintain vascular access while protecting the clinician from accidental cuts and needle sticks during procedures. These effective and useful devices and kits include the Futura Safety Scalpel and an improved line of angiography needles such as the Merit Advance and the SecureLoc Safety Introducer Needle. In addition, we offer an extensive line of sheath introducers (Prelude ) and mini access kits (MAK and S MAK ), which are designed to provide clinicians with smooth, less traumatic, and convenient access to the patient's vasculature. Merit sheath introducers are designed for radial and femoral approach when performing diagnostic and interventional procedures. We expanded our line of radial (mini access) sheath introducers with the addition of a 7 French size Prelude Sheath Introducer during the year ended December 31, 2013 In October 2013, we acquired the assets of Radial Assist, which include the Rad Board, Rad Board Xtra, Rad Trac, and Rad Rest devices.The Rad Board is designed to provide a larger work space for physicians and an area for patients to rest their arms during radial procedures and has a section of lead free Xenolite embedded in the Rad Board to help reduce scatter radiation exposure . The Rad Board Xtra is designed to work in conjunction with the Rad Board by extending the usable work space and allowing for a 90 degree perpendicular extension of the arm for physicians who pref er to perform procedures at a 90 degree angle. The Rad Trac is also designed to be used with the Rad Board and facilitates placement and removal of the Rad Board with the patient still on the table. The Rad Rest is a disposable, single use product designed to stabilize the arm by ergonomically supporting the elbow, forearm and wrist during radial procedures. 2 Table of Contents Safety and Waste Management Systems. We offer a variety of safety related products and kits. Our ShortStop and ShortStop Advantage Temporary Sharps Holders address the potential safety issues associated with accidental needle sticks. Our extensive line of color coded Medallion Syringes and the PAL Pen and Label Medication Labeling System comply with the latest patient safety initiatives of The Joint Commission (formerly known as JCAHO ) and are designed to help minimize mix ups in administering medication. We also offer waste management products to help avoid accidental exposure to contaminated fluids. These include our Occupational Safety and Health Administration ( OSHA ) compliant waste disposal basins the BackStop , BackStop+ , MiniStop , MiniStop+ , and DugOut . These products have been designed to complement other Merit devices and are included in many of our kits and procedure trays in order to make the clinical setting safer for both clinicians and the patients. Hemostasis Management Devices . In recent years, radial artery catheterization has become increasingly popular as an alternative to femoral artery access when performing diagnostic and interventional cardiology procedures. There are many ways to achieve hemostasis after a diagnostic or interventional procedure. In 2013, we acquired several pressure assisted devices from Datascope, including the Air Band, which we have re branded as the Safeguard Radial Compression Device (the Safeguard Radial ). The Safeguard Radial is a self adhesive wristband designed to assist hemostasis of the radial artery after a transradial procedure. The Safeguard Radial delivers adjustable compression of the radial puncture site with an inflatable bulb and standard luer valve for easy inflation and deflation with any standard luer syringe. Through the Datascope acquisition, we also acquired the Safeguard Pressure Assisted Device, which is designed to obtain and maintain hemostasis after femoral access. The Safeguard Pressure Assisted Device offers hands free adjustable pressure of the puncture site with an inflatable bulb. We offer the Clo Sur PLUS P.A.D , which is intended for the local management of bleeding wounds and the creation of a barrier to bacterial penetration. Non invasive devices, including topically applied hemostatic dressings, are used primarily in diagnostic procedures; however, radial access sites use compression devices on both diagnostic and interventional procedures. As a result, we have developed and offer 2 independent, highly differentiated radial compression systems, the Finale Compression Device and the RADStat Radial Artery Compression Device. Guide Wires and Accessories. Our diagnostic guide wires are used to traverse vascular anatomy and aid in placing catheters and other devices. Our pre coated, high performance InQwire Diagnostic Guide Wires are lubricious and are available in a wide range of configurations to meet clinicians' diagnostic needs. These wires provide enhanced maneuverability through tortuous anatomy. The Merit Laureate Hydrophilic Guide Wire has a consistent, lubricious coating intended to promote rapid catheter exchanges and minimize friction. The Merit Laureate was designed with 1 to 1 torque to reduce wire whipping. We also offer the BowTie Guide Wire Insertion Device, which is used to facilitate alignment of the proximal end of a micro guide wire into the tip of a device such as a dilator, introducer, or catheter. The BowTie has 2 funneled ends and a tear away slit for easy removal. We also offer a line of torque devices (SeaDragon and H2O Torq ), which are guide wire steering tools that can be used on both standard and hydrophilic guide wires in both large and small diameters and are often included as a comp1nt in our angioplasty packs. Diagnostic Catheters. We offer diagnostic catheters for use during both cardiology and radiology angiographic procedures. Our diagnostic catheter offering includes our Impress line of peripheral catheters and the Performa line of cardiology catheters. These catheters offer interventional radiologists and cardiologists superior performance during a variety of angiography procedures. During 2013, we introduced the MIV Radial Ventriculogram Pigtail Catheter to address the difficulty in accessing the left ventricle from the radial artery when using standard femoral approach catheters. MIV Radial Catheters are designed to angle toward the left cusp from the radial approach, facilitating easier insertion into the ventricle. Hemostasis Valves. We have developed a broad line of technically sophisticated, clinically acclaimed, hemostasis valves, MAP Merit Angioplasty Packs and angioplasty accessories. Hemostasis valves connect to catheters and allow passage of additional guide wires, balloon catheters and other devices into the vasculature, while reducing the amount of blood loss during the procedures. Our hemostasis valve line includes the Honor , AccessPLUS , Access 9 , DoublePlay , MBA , and the Passage . Inflation Devices. During PCI and PPI procedures, balloons and or stents are placed within the vasculature. The balloons must be carefully placed, inflated, and deflated within the vessel in order to achieve optimal results without injury to the patient. For more than 2 decades, we have offered an extensive, innovative line of inflation devices that accurately measure pressures during balloon and stent deployment. In 2013, we introduced the BASIXTouch Inflation Syringe, offering clinicians 1 handed preparation and priming for faster preparation time. The Blue Diamond Digital Inflation Device features an angled gauge for better viewing. Additionally, our IntelliSystem and Monarch Inflation Devices (state of the art digital inflation systems), as well as the BasixCOMPAK Inflation Syringe, offer clinicians a wide range of features and prices. 3 Table of Contents Drainage Catheters and Accessories. We have a broad line of catheters for nephrostomy, abscess and other drainage procedures. The ReSolve Locking Drainage Catheter's unique, convenient locking mechanism is appreciated by clinicians and patients who often comment on the enhanced comfort that the catheter provides them. We also offer a range of catheter fixation devices, including the Revolution Catheter Securement Device, which was designed to save time, enhance patient comfort and improve cost effectiveness. We also provide a wide selection of accessories that complement our drainage catheters, including tubing sets and drainage bags. For non vascular applications, we offer mini access kits (MAK NV ) designed for easy visualization and quick access into the drainage area. For enhanced visibility, the device features an echo enhanced needle and radiopaque marker tip on the introducer. Paracentesis, Thoracentesis and Pericardiocentesis Catheters. Paracentesis is a procedure to remove fluid that has accumulated in the abdominal cavity (perit1al fluid). Our 1 Step Drainage Catheter, Safety Paracentesis Procedure Tray ( SPPT ) and Thoracentesis and Paracentesis Set ( TAPS ) are designed to provide clinicians with a safe, convenient and cost effective method for removing this fluid accumulation. Thoracentesis is a procedure to remove fluid that has accumulated in the pleural space. Our 1 Step product line includes a valved version of the device. The Valved 1 Step Centesis Catheter and TAPS may also be used to remove excess fluid in the pleural space during a thoracentesis. Pericardiocentesis is a procedure in which fluid is aspirated from the pericardial sac (the sac enveloping the heart). Our pericardiocentesis kit is designed as an organized, ready to use, convenient tray to assist the clinician in draining fluid quickly from the pericardial sac. Thrombosis Products. We offer an extensive line of products designed to treat clots that block the flow of blood in veins and arteries. Our therapeutic thrombolytic infusion systems include the Fountain Infusion System and the Mistique Infusion Catheter. These catheters are used to treat thrombus (blood clot) formation in the peripheral vessels of the body, including native dialysis fistula and synthetic grafts. A new low profile aspiration catheter, the ASAP LP has been added to the ASAP line of Aspiration Catheters, giving clinicians 2 options for the safe and efficient removal of fresh, soft emboli and thrombi from the vessels of the arterial system. Multipurpose Microcatheters. We offer specialty catheters designed for intravascular use, including peripheral and coronary vasculature. Once the subselective region has been accessed, a microcatheter can be used for the controlled and selective infusion of diagnostic, embolic microspheres or particles, or therapeutic agents into vessels. The Merit Maestro microcatheter has a swan neck design to seat catheters in the vessel and to reduce the recoiling effect of the embolic agent as it is introduced. The EmboCath Plus infusion microcatheter was part of the BioSphere acquisition. Embolic Particles and Products. We offer embolic microspheres and particles and embolic delivery systems. These products include Embosphere Microspheres and EmboGold Microspheres, which are marketed for symptomatic uterine fibroids, hypervascularized tumors, and arteriovenous malformations in the United States, the European Union, and several other markets outside the United States; HepaSphere Microspheres , which are marketed in the European Union, Brazil, and Russia and other emerging markets for drug delivery in the treatment of primary and metastatic liver cancer. We received regulatory approval in the European Union in 2013 to sell HepaSphere Microspheres in a smaller size (30 60 m), giving physicians the ability to achieve more distal occlusions when embolizing hypervascular tumors and arteriovenous malformations; and QuadraSphere Micropsheres, which are marketed for the treatment of hypervascularized tumors and arteriovenous malformations in the United States. Bearing nsPVA Particles, introduced in 2013 and also marketed for symptomatic uterine fibroids, hypervascularized tumors, and arteriovenous malformations in the United States, the European Union, and several other markets outside the United States. Vascular Retrieval Devices . Our snares or vascular retrieval devices are single use products designed for foreign body manipulation and retrieval and can be used to retrieve inferior vena cava filters, reposition indwelling venous catheters, strip fibrin sheath formation, and assist in central venal access venipuncture. We offer the 1 Snare , a single loop device, and the EN Snare Endovascular Snare System, which has 3 interlaced loops. Both are offered in multiple sizes to accommodate a broad range of vessels throughout the body. Angiography and Angioplasty Accessories. We offer the Ostial PRO Stent Positioning System, a medical grade disposable guide wire system designed to provide consistent and precise stent implantation in aorto ostial lesions during coronary or peripheral interventional procedures. The Ostial PRO can be used to introduce and position stents and other interventional 4 Table of Contents devices within the coronary and peripheral vasculature and function as an alignment tool. Additional angiographic accessories include the Flow Control Switch , an integrated, 1 handed, single channel switch designed with clinician and patient safety in mind. Since the introduction of the CCS Coronary Control Syringe line in 1988, we have continued to develop innovative, problem solving devices, accessories, kits and procedure trays for use during minimally invasive diagnosis and treatment of coronary artery and peripheral disease. We now offer a broad range of specialty syringes, including color coded Medallion Syringes and the proprietary VacLok Vacuum Pressure Syringe. The most recent line extensions to our syringe product family are frosted and sword handled Medallion syringes. Additionally, we offer an extensive line of kits containing fluid management products such as syringes, manifolds, stopcocks, tubing, and disposable pressure transducers (Meritrans ) for measurement of pressures within the vessels and chambers of the heart. The TRAM and TRAM P Manifolds with Integral Transducers combine a low torque manifold with the transducer. We also provide devices, kits and procedure trays to effectively and safely manage fluids, contrast media and waste during angiography and interventional procedures. The Miser Contrast Management System complements our comprehensive line of fluid management products used in angiography procedures. Hemodialysis and Perit1al Dialysis. We offer perit1al dialysis catheters and accessories as part of our dialysis and interventional nephrology product line, including the Flex Neck and ExxTended Perit1al Dialysis Catheters and Y TEC Implantation Kits. The Centros and CentrosFLO Long Term Hemodialysis Catheters anchor our chronic dialysis line. The ProGuide is considered a workhorse catheter for chronic dialysis and provides a platform for the development of additional Merit products in the dialysis and interventional nephrology market. For example, the new Prelude Short Sheath provides vascular access to dialysis grafts, along with our extensive line of micro access devices such as the MAK and S MAK line of mini access kits. We also offer a wide range of guide wires, diagnostic catheters, therapeutic infusion systems and safety products that can be used during dialysis related procedures. The OuTake Catheter Extractor is used to remove tunneled chronic dialysis catheters from dialysis patients. A curved introducer needle aids clinicians who choose to place a tunneled dialysis catheter over a wire with a single stick. The Slip Not Suture Retention Device provides a unique and effective method for securing a purse string suture that controls bleeding after an arteriovenous ( AV ) fistula intervention. In addition, we offer the Impress 30 cm Fistula Catheters, which can be used by interventional nephrologists. Our dialysis and interventional nephrology products are designed to provide comprehensive coverage for completing AV fistula interventions. Electrophysiology ("EP") Products. With our acquisition of Thomas Medical Products, Inc. ("Thomas Medical") in 2012, we now offer innovative solutions to address lead implantation and therapeutic delivery in the rapidly expanding cardiac rhythm management and electrophysiology fields. Cardiac rhythm management is the field of cardiovascular disease therapy that relates to the detection and treatment of abnormally fast (tachycardia) and abnormally slow (bradycardia) heart rhythms, or electrical patterns in the heart, and heart failure. We offer products that improve lead delivery and vessel access. The ClassicSheath Splittable Hemostatic Introducer System allows for insertion of cardiac pacer leads for pacemakers and implantable cardioverter defibrillators. Its robust valve design reduces the risk of air embolism and backbleed. We also offer the Worley Advanced LV Delivery System to aid in the insertion and implantation of left ventricular leads, which are wire electrodes inserted into the coronary sinus to the left lateral wall of the heart to pace the left side of the heart for heart failure patients. The Worley Advanced LV Delivery System has been shown to reduce lead failure, improve target lead location and reduce procedure times. Cardiac electrophysiology is the study of diagnosing and treating the electrical activities of the heart. Common procedures include diagnostic EP studies and therapeutic ablation procedures designed to deter arrhythmia. We offer the HeartSpan Transseptal Needle, which is designed with a larger ergonomic handle, unique unibody needle design and optimal needle sharpness; the Heartspan Transeptal Sheath, which features an improved hemostasis valve for reduced blood loss and air embolism, smooth sheath to dilator transition for easier transeptal crossing, and reinforced stainless steel tubing for excellent torque response; and the Heartspan Resiliance Dilator, which is designed to minimize the risk of the needle cutting out small pieces of plastic inside the dilator. Endoscopy Products for Gastroenterology, Pulmonology, and Thoracic Surgery Airway Stents. Through our Merit Endotek division, we sell a variety of non vascular stents. Our AERO and AERO DV Fully Covered Tracheobronchial Stents are used by interventional pulmonologists and thoracic surgeons. These products offer our customers patented, fully covered, self expanding metal stents used to improve patency of patient airways both tracheal and bronchial and to offer palliation to patients suffering from strictures caused by cancer. Esophageal Stents. The Alimaxx ES and the new EndoMAXX Fully Covered Esophageal Stents are used by interventional gastroenterologists, ENTs and thoracic surgeons to palliate symptoms associated with malignant tumors and strictures affecting the esophagus, as well as to treat concomitant tracheoesophageal fistulae. 5 Table of Contents Biliary Stents. The Alimaxx B Biliary Stent System is used by interventional gastroenterologists to palliate symptoms associated with malignant tumors affecting the bile duct. Additionally, we sell a plastic biliary stent that is used to restore patency and relieve symptoms associated with strictures and blockages within the biliary system. These stents are often used to stage treatment of malignant tumors such as pancreatic cancer and other serious conditions. Stent Sizing Device. Merit Endotek also sells the AEROSIZER tracheobronchial stent sizing device which is used in interventional pulmonology procedures. This proprietary product allows length and diameter measurement accuracy, thus minimizing the possibility of stent mis sizing and associated cost and complications. Guide Wires for Non Vascular Procedures. MAXXWIRE is a line of specialty guide wires that have pulmonology and gastroenterology applications. Bipolar Coagulation Probes. Bipolar probes are used by physicians as 1 means of controlling bleeding within the gastrointestinal tract. Our Brighton Bipolar Probe is now sold directly by our Merit Endotek division and our original bipolar probe is sold on an original equipment manufacturer ( OEM ) basis to customers who market them to a large number of gastroenterologists. Inflation Devices. Merit Endotek's BIG60 Inflation Device is a 60 mL device designed to inflate and deflate non vascular balloon dilators while monitoring and displaying inflation pressures up to 12 atmospheres. Merit Endotek also offers Endotek labeled versions of the BasixCOMPAK and Monarch Inflation Devices to customers in pulmonology, gastroenterology, and thoracic surgery. Cholangiography Rapid Refill Continuous Injection Kits . Merit Endotek's BiliQUICK Cholangiography Rapid Refill Continuous Injection Kit incorporates a convenient all in 1 kit that is used in gastroenterology to deliver contrast media both quickly and efficiently while eliminating unnecessary time spent refilling the injection syringe. Our Inject10 n Coronary Control Syringe is included in the kit. Oropharyngeal Airway, Bite Block and Oxygen Administration Device . The TIO 3 in 1 is a combination product that incorporates the benefits of an oropharyngeal airway, bite block and oxygen administration device into 1 convenient, easy to use device, enhancing procedure efficiency. Specialty Procedure Products In addition to the procedures and devices detailed above, interventional radiology and other special procedure labs perform a variety of additional minimally invasive diagnostic and interventional procedures. We offer a variety of devices and accessories used during these procedures. Discography Products. Discography is a technique used to determine whether a disc is the source of pain in patients with back or neck pain. During discography, contrast medium is injected into the disc and the patient's response to the injection is noted. Due to their quality and accuracy, our digital inflation devices (IntelliSystem and Monarch) are used in many pain management clinics. Coated Wires and Tubes . We provide coating services for medical tubes and wires under the Merit Medical OEM brand. We offer coated tubes and wires to customers on a spool or as further manufactured comp1nts like hypotubes, guide wire comp1nts, coated mandrels stylets and coated needles. Our coating operation facility is located in Venlo, The Netherlands, where PFOA free PTFE and Hydrophilic coatings are applied to bulk lengths of bare wire and tubing, prior to cutting, using a proprietary spool to spool coating method. Our coating technology, developed more than 20 years ago, results in consistently coated medical tubes and wires with tight tolerances. In the summer of 2013, we opened a state of the art hypotube manufacturing Center of Excellence in Galway, Ireland, including advanced laser cutting and ablation, passivation, cleaning and other hypotube manufacturing processes. The Merit Hypotube TM is used as the catheter shaft in PTCA and PTA balloon catheters, as well as functional guide wires. Pressure Sensors . Our sensor division manufactures and sells microelectromechanical systems ( MEMS ) pressure sensor comp1nts focusing on piezoresistive pressure sensors in various forms, including bare silicon die, die mounted on ceramic substrates, and custom assemblies for specific customers. 6 Table of Contents MARKETING AND SALES Target Market Industry. Our principal target markets include diagnostic and interventional cardiology, interventional radiology, interventional gastroenterology, interventional pulmonology, vascular surgery, interventional nephrology, and thoracic surgery. According to U.S. government statistics, cardiovascular disease continues to be a leading cause of death and a significant health problem in the United States. Treatment options range from dietary changes to surgery, depending on the nature of the specific disease or disorder. Endovascular techniques, including angioplasty, stenting, and endoluminal stent grafts, continue to represent important therapeutic options for the treatment of vascular disease. We derive a large percentage of our revenues from sales of products used during percutaneous diagnostic and interventional procedures such as angiography, angioplasty, and stent placement, and we intend to pursue additional sales growth by building on our existing market position in both catheter technology and accessory products. In addition to products used in the treatment of coronary and peripheral vascular disease, we continue our efforts to develop and distribute other devices used in the major markets we serve. For example, we have developed and are distributing products used for percutaneous drainage. Prior to the widespread use of CT or ultrasound imaging, surgery was necessary to drain internal fluid from body cavities and organs. Currently, percutaneous drainage is frequently prescribed as the treatment of choice for many types of fluid collections. Our family of drainage catheters and associated devices are used by physicians in interventional radiology, vascular surgery and cardiology catheter lab procedures for the percutaneous drainage collection of simple serous fluid to viscous fluid (blood, or infected secretions) within the body. As part of our embolic microsphere sales and marketing efforts, we attend major medical conventions throughout the world pertaining to our targeted markets and invest in market development (including physician training), practice building, referral ne2rk education and patient outreach. We work closely with major interventional radiology centers in the areas of training, therapy awareness programs, clinical studies and ongoing research. We also service the growing interventional nephrology market. Dialysis, or cleaning of the blood, is necessary in conditions such as acute renal failure, chronic renal failure and end stage renal disease. The kidneys remove excess water and chemical wastes from blood, permitting clean blood to return to the circulatory system. When the kidneys malfunction, waste substances are not properly excreted, creating an abnormal buildup of wastes in the bloodstream. Dialysis machines are used to treat this condition. Dialysis catheters, which connect the patient to the dialysis machine, are used at various stages in the treatment of dialysis patients. In the past few years, we have added catheters and other accessories to our dialysis related product offering. We believe the development of our Endotek division and the move into the areas of interventional gastroenterology, pulmonology and thoracic surgery will open up new opportunities to sell existing Merit products, such as inflation devices, syringes, centesis catheters and procedure kits to those markets, but will also provide additional offerings built upon our non vascular stent and guide wire technology. In general, our target markets are characterized by rapid change resulting from technological advances and scientific discoveries. We plan to continue to develop and launch innovative products to support clinical trends and to address the increasing demands of these markets. Marketing Strategy. Our marketing strategy is focused on identifying and introducing a regular flow of highly profitable differentiated products that meet customer needs. In order to stay abreast of customer needs, we seek suggestions from health care professionals working in multiple fields of medicine, including cardiology, radiology, gastroenterology, pulmonology and thoracic surgery. Suggestions for new products and product improvements may also come from engineers, sales people, physicians and technicians who perform clinical procedures. When we determine that a product suggestion demonstrates a sustainable competitive advantage, meets customer needs, fits strategically and technologically with our business and has a good potential financial return, we generally assemble a project team comprised of individuals from our sales, marketing, engineering, manufacturing, legal, and quality assurance departments. This team works to identify the customer requirements, integrate the design, compile necessary documentation and testing, and prepare the product for market introduction. We believe that 1 of our marketing strengths is our capacity to rapidly conceive, design, develop and introduce new products. U.S. and International Sales. Sales of our products in the U.S. accounted for 63%, 63% and 65% of our total sales for the years ended December 31, 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively. In the U.S. we have a dedicated corporate sales organization primarily focused on selling to end user hospitals and clinics, major buying groups and integrated healthcare ne2rks. 7 Table of Contents We have direct sales representatives and contract with independent dealer organizations and custom procedure tray manufacturers to distribute our products worldwide, including territories in Europe, Africa, the Middle East, Asia, South and Central America, Oceania and Canada. In 2013, our international sales grew approximately 13% over our 2012 international sales, and accounted for approximately $165.8 million, or 37% of our total sales. Our Merit Endotek division has a small, but growing, presence in international markets. With the recent and planned additions to our product lines, we believe that our international sales will continue to increase. We require our international dealers to inventory products and sell directly to customers within defined sales territories. Each of our products must be approved for sale under the laws of the country in which it is sold. International dealers are responsible for compliance with all applicable laws and regulations in their respective countries. We consider training to be a critical factor in the success of our direct sales force. Our sales representatives are trained by our personnel at our facilities, by a senior sales person in their respective territories, at regular national and regional sales meetings, by consulting cardiologists, radiologists, endoscopists, and thoracic surgeons and by observation of procedures in laboratories and operating rooms throughout the U.S. OEM Sales. Our global OEM division sells comp1nts and finished devices, including molded comp1nts, sub assembled goods, custom kits and bulk non sterile goods, to medical device manufacturers. These products may be combined with other comp1nts and or products from other companies and sold under a Merit or third party label. Products sold by the OEM division can be customized and enhanced to customer specifications, including packaging, labeling and a variety of physical modifications. The OEM division serves customers with a staff of regional sales representatives based in the U.S., Europe and Asia and a dedicated OEM Engineering and Customer Service Group. CUSTOMERS We provide products to hospitals and clinic based cardiologists, radiologists, neurologists, nephrologists, vascular surgeons, interventional gastroenterologists and pulmonologists, thoracic surgeons, physiatrists (pain management physicians), technicians and nurses. Hospitals and acute care facilities in the United States purchase our products through our direct sales force, distributors, OEM partners, and custom procedure tray manufacturers who assemble and combine our products in custom kits and packs. Outside the United States, hospitals and acute care facilities purchase our products through our direct sales force, or, in the absence of a sales force, through independent distributors or OEM partners. In 2013, our U.S. sales force made approximately 43% of our sales directly to U.S. hospitals (including 3 percent of our total sales for our Merit Endotek division) and approximately eight percent of our sales through other channels such as U.S. custom procedure tray manufacturers and distributors. We also sell products to other medical device companies through our U.S. OEM sales force, which accounted for approximately 15% of our 2013 sales. Approximately 37% of our 2013 sales were made to international markets by our direct European sales force, international distributors, and our OEM sales force (includes 3 percent of our total sales for OEM international). Sales to our largest customer accounted for approximately 3 percent of total sales during the year ended December 31, 2013 RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT Our commitment to innovation is demonstrated through the delivery of several new products by our research and development team. In 2013, we launched the BASIXTouch Inflation Syringe. This device is designed to improve the ability of physicians to inflate and deflate angioplasty products, which includes higher volume and higher pressure balloons, improved inflation times, 1 handed prep, and an ergonomic handle. The ASAP LP Aspiration Catheter is a new smaller size aspiration catheter which facilitates the extraction of clots from within coronary arteries. The addition of the ASAP LP Aspiration Catheter broadens our aspiration catheter line by giving physicians the choice for treating small or large vessels. These products offer time saving convenience during interventional cardiology procedures. The ConcierGE Guiding Catheter is another interventional cardiology product we released, which facilitates access to coronary arteries. We now offer a catheter with improved torque control and kink resistance. This product gives the physician the confidence to advance balloons and stents to meet the clinical need. 8 Table of Contents Our Bearing nsPVA Embolization Particles rounds out our top releases. These are irregularly shaped, hydrophilic, nonresorbable particles produced from polyvinyl alcohol. These embolization particles are intended to provide vascular occlusion or reduction of blood flow within target vessels upon selective placement through a variety of catheters. Our research and development expenses were approximately $339 million, $27.8 million, and $219 million in 2013, 2012 and 2011, respectively. We frequently develop new product ideas or implement product improvements through the collaborative efforts of skilled physicians with whom we have long term relationships, our Chief Executive Officer, our Vice President of Research and Development and our research and development, sales and marketing teams. Currently, we have research and development facilities in Galway, Ireland; South Jordan, Utah; Angleton and Dallas, Texas; Malvern, Pennsylvania; Jackson Township, New Jersey; Paris, France; and Venlo, The Netherlands. MANUFACTURING We manufacture many of our products utilizing our proprietary technology and our expertise in plastic injection and insert molding. We generally contract with third parties for the tooling of our molds, but we design and own most of our molds. We utilize our experience in injection and insert molding technologies in the manufacture of most of the custom comp1nts used in our products. We have received International Standards Organization ( ISO ) 134852003 certification for our facilities in Utah, Texas, Virginia, Pennsylvania, Ireland and France. We have also received ISO 90012008 certification for our Merit Sensor Systems, Inc. ( Merit Sensors ) facility in South Jordan, Utah. We either assemble the electronic monitors and sensors used in our IntelliSystem and Monarch inflation devices from standard electronic comp1nts or purchase them from third party suppliers. Merit Sensors, 1 of our wholly owned subsidiaries, develops and markets silicon pressure sensors. Merit Sensors presently supplies all of the sensors we utilize in our digital inflation devices. We currently produce and package all of our microspheres. Manufacturing of our microsphere products includes the synthesis and processing of raw materials and third party manufactured compounds. Our products are manufactured at several factories, including facilities located in South Jordan and West Jordan, Utah; Malvern, Pennsylvania; Galway, Ireland; Venlo, The Netherlands; Paris, France; Angleton, Texas; and Chester, Virginia. See Item 2 Properties. We have also contracted with a third party manufacturer to produce some of our products at a contract manufacturing facility in Mexico. We have distribution centers located in South Jordan, Utah; Chester, Virginia; Malvern, Pennsylvania; Beijing and Hong Kong, China; and Maastricht, The Netherlands. We believe that our variety of suppliers for raw materials and comp1nts necessary for the manufacture of our products, as well as our long term relationships with such suppliers, promote stability in our manufacturing processes. Historically, we have not been materially affected by interruptions with such suppliers; however, there can be no assurance that we will not experience supply disruptions in the future. We seek to develop relationships with potential back up suppliers for materials and comp1nts in the event of supply interruptions. COMPETITION We compete in several global markets, including diagnostic and interventional cardiology, interventional radiology, vascular surgery, interventional nephrology, thoracic surgery, interventional gastroenterology and pulmonology. In the interventional cardiology and radiology markets, as well as the gastroenterology and pulmonology markets, we compete with large international, multi divisional medical supply companies such as Cordis Corporation (Johnson & Johnson), Boston Scientific Corporation, Medtronic, St. Jude Medical, C.R. Bard, Abbott Laboratories, Teleflex, Cook Incorporated, and Terumo Corporation. Medium size companies we compete with include AngioDynamics, Vascular Solutions, B. Braun, Olympus, Edwards Lifesciences, and ICU Medical. Our primary competitive embolotherapy product has been Embosphere Microspheres. Currently, the primary products with which our microspheres compete are spherical PVA, sold by Boston Scientific Corporation, BTG and Terumo Corporation; Embozene, sold by CeloNova Biosciences, Inc.; gel foam, sold by Pfizer Inc.; and non spherical (particle) PVA, sold by Boston Scientific and Cook Incorporated. Our principal competitors in uterine fibroid embolization ( UFE ) are BTG, Boston Scientific, Cook, Cordis Corporation, Pfizer CeloNova BioSciences, and Terumo, as well as companies selling or developing non embolotherapy solutions for UFE. 9 Table of Contents The principal competitive factors in the markets in which our products are sold are quality, price, value, device feature, customer service, breadth of line, and customer relationships. We believe our products have achieved market acceptance due to the quality of materials and workmanship of our products, their innovative design, our willingness to customize our products to fit customer needs, and our prompt attention to customer requests. Our products are priced competitively, but generally not below prices for competing products. 1 of our primary competitive strengths is our relative stability in the marketplace; a comprehensive, broad line of ancillary products; and our history of introducing a variety of new products and product line extensions to the market on a regular basis. Based on available industry data, with respect to the number of procedures performed, we believe we are the leading provider of digital inflation technology in the world. In addition, we believe we are 1 of the market leaders in the United States for inflation devices, hemostasis devices and torque devices. We believe we are a market leader in the United States for control syringes, waste disposal systems, tubing and manifold kits . We anticipate the recent and planned additions to our product lines will enable us to compete even more effectively in both the U.S. and international markets. There is no assurance that we will be able to maintain our existing competitive advantages or compete successfully in the future. Within the field of uterine artery embolization, we believe we are the market share leader and 1 of only 3 companies in the United States to have embolic products specifically indicated for use in UFE. Based on both research and clinical studies conducted on our product for UFE, we believe we offer physicians a high degree of consistent and predictable product performance, ease of use, targeted delivery, and durable vessel occlusion, and therefore satisfactory short and long term clinical outcomes validated by peer reviewed publications, when compared to our competitors. We derive a substantial majority of our revenues from sales of products used in diagnostic angiography and interventional cardiology and radiology procedures. We believe medical professionals are starting to use new interventional procedures and devices, as well as drugs for the treatment and prevention of cardiovascular disease. These new methods, procedures and devices may render some of our products obsolete or limit the markets for our products. However, with the advent of vascular stents and other procedures, we have experienced continued growth in sales of our products. PROPRIETARY RIGHTS AND PATENT LITIGATION We have a number of U.S. and foreign issued patents and pending patent applications, including patents and rights to patent applications acquired through strategic transactions, which relate to various aspects of our products and technology. The duration of our patents is determined by the laws of the country of issuance and for the U.S. is typically 20 years from the date of filing of the patent. As of December 31, 2013, we owned more than 500 U.S. and international patents and patent applications. We also operate under licenses from owners of certain other patents, patent applications, technology, trade secrets, know how, copyrights and trademarks. Merit and the Merit logo are trademarks in the U.S. and other countries. In addition to Merit and the Merit logo, we have used, registered or applied for registration of other specific trademarks and service marks to help distinguish our products, technologies, and services from those of our competitors in the U.S. and foreign countries. See Products above. The duration of our trademark registrations varies from country to country; in the U.S. we generally are able to maintain our trademark rights and renew any trademark registrations for as long as the trademarks are in use. We have received over 300 U.S. and foreign trademark registrations, and other U.S. and foreign trademark applications are currently pending. Some of our products and product documentation are protected under U.S. and international copyright laws related to the protection of intellectual property and proprietary information. We have registered copyrights relating to certain software used in our electronic inflation devices. On September 20, 2013, a third party filed suit for patent infringement against us in the United States District Court, District of Delaware, alleging that we infringe certain patents. The patents generally relate to aspiration catheters. The suit is in its early stages and we are still evaluating the complaint and our defenses. REGULATION U.S. Regulation. The FDA and other federal, state and local authorities regulate our products and product related activities. Pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act ( FDCA ) and the regulations promulgated under that act, the FDA regulates the design, development, clinical trials, testing, manufacture, packaging, labeling, storage, distribution and promotion of medical devices. We believe that our products and procedures are in material compliance with all applicable FDA regulations, but the regulations are subject to change. We cannot predict the effect, if any, that these changes might have on our 10 Table of Contents business, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, if the FDA believes that we are not in compliance with the FDCA, it can institute proceedings to detain or seize products, require a recall, enjoin future violations, and or seek civil and or criminal penalties against us and our officers and employees. If we fail to comply with these regulatory requirements, our business, financial condition and results of operations could be negatively affected. FDA Premarket Review. In general, we cannot introduce a new medical device into the market until we obtain market clearance through a 510(k) premarket notification or approval through a premarket approval ( PMA ) application. Some devices, typically lower risk devices, are subject to specific exemptions from premarket review. In addition, in limited cases devices may come to the market through alternative procedures, such as a humanitarian device exemption ( HDE ), which applies only to devices that are intended to treat or diagnose diseases or conditions affecting fewer than 4,000 people in the United States each year. The FDA's 510(k) clearance procedure is less rigorous than the PMA approval procedure, but is available only to sponsors who can establish that their device is substantially equivalent to a legally marketed predicate device that (i) was on the market prior to the enactment of the Medical Device Amendments of 1976, (ii) has been reclassified from Class III to Class II, or (iii) has been cleared through the 510(k) procedure. The 510(k) clearance procedure usually takes between 3 months and 1 year from the date a 510(k) notification is submitted, but it may take longer. The FDA may find that substantial equivalence has not been shown and, as a result, require additional clinical or non clinical testing to support a 510(k) or require a PMA application. PMA applications must be supported by valid scientific evidence to demonstrate the safety and effectiveness of the subject device. Such evidence typically includes the results of human clinical trials, bench tests, and laboratory and animal studies. The PMA application must also contain a complete description of the device and its comp1nts, and a detailed description of the manufacturing process and controls for the device. As part of the PMA application review, the FDA will inspect the manufacturer's facilities for compliance with the FDA's Quality System Regulations ( QSR ). If the FDA approves the PMA, it may place restrictions on the device. If the FDA's evaluation of the PMA application or the manufacturing facility is not favorable, the FDA may deny approval of the PMA application or issue a not approvable letter. The FDA may also require additional clinical trials, which can delay the PMA approval process by several years. The PMA application process can be expensive and generally takes several years to complete. There is also a substantial user fee that must be paid to FDA in connection with the submission of each PMA application. After the PMA is approved, if significant changes are made to a device, its manufacturing or labeling, a PMA supplement containing additional information must be filed for prior FDA approval. PMA supplements often must be approved by FDA before the modification to the device, the labeling, or the manufacturing process may be implemented. If human clinical trials of a medical device are required for FDA clearance or approval and the device presents a significant risk, the sponsor of the trial must file an investigational device exemption ( IDE ) application with the FDA prior to commencing human clinical trials. The IDE application must be supported by data, typically including the results of animal and or laboratory testing. If the IDE application is approved by the FDA and 1 or more institutional review boards ( IRBs ), human clinical trials may begin at a specific number of institutional investigational sites with the specific number of patients approved by the FDA. If the device presents a non significant risk to the patient, a sponsor may begin the clinical trial after obtaining approval for the trial by 1 or more IRBs without separate approval from the FDA. Clinical trials are subject to extensive recordkeeping and reporting requirements. Our clinical trials must be conducted under the oversight of an IRB for the relevant clinical trial sites and must comply with FDA regulations, including but not limited to those relating to good clinical practices. We are also required to obtain each patient's written informed consent in form and substance that complies with both FDA requirements and state and federal privacy and human subject protection regulations. We, the FDA, or the IRB may suspend a clinical trial at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the risks to study subjects outweigh the anticipated benefits. Submission of an IDE application does not give assurance that the FDA will issue the IDE. If the IDE application is approved, there can be no assurance the FDA will determine that the data derived from the trials support the safety and effectiveness of the device or warrant the continuation of clinical trials. An IDE supplement must be submitted to and approved by the FDA before a sponsor or investigator may make a change to the investigational plan in such a way that may affect its scientific soundness, study indication or the rights, safety or welfare of human subjects. The FDA clearance and approval processes for medical devices are expensive, uncertain and lengthy. There can be no assurance that we will be able to obtain necessary regulatory clearances or approvals for any product on a timely basis or at all. Delays in receipt of or failure to receive such clearances or approvals, the loss of previously received clearances or approvals, or the failure to comply with existing or future regulatory requirements could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. In November 2010, we received FDA approval of our IDE application to conduct a phase 3 clinical trial protocol to treat primary liver cancer with QuadraSphere Microspheres, combined with the chemotherapeutic agent doxorubicin, compared to 11 Table of Contents conventional transarterial chemoembolization, or cTACE, with doxorubicin. Enrollment in the clinical trial has begun both in Europe and in the United States. Additionally, in October 2012 we received FDA approval of our IDE application to conduct a phase 3 clinical trial to compare the effectiveness and safety of prostate artery embolization compared to transurethral resection of the prostate for the treatment of benign prostatic hyperplasia. Our Embosphere Microspheres to be used in these trials have already received the CE mark for the indication of prostate artery embolization in the EU. Our inability to complete either of these trials, or our receipt of unfavorable or inconsistent data from either trial may adversely affect our ability to obtain approval for these new indications Changes in Cleared or Approved Devices. We must obtain new FDA 510(k) clearance or supplemental premarket approval when there is a major change or modification in the intended use or indications for use of a legally marketed device or a change or modification of the device, including certain manufacturing changes, product enhancements and product line extensions of a legally marketed device, as required by FDA regulations. In some cases, supporting clinical data may be required. The FDA may determine that a new or modified device is not substantially equivalent to a predicate device or may require that additional information, including clinical data, be submitted before a determination is made, either of which could significantly delay the introduction of new or modified devices. Current Good Manufacturing Practices and Quality System Regulation. The FDCA requires us to comply with the Quality System Regulation ( QSR ) and Good Manufacturing Practice ( GMP ) requirements pertaining to all aspects of our product design and manufacturing processes, including requirements for packaging, labeling and record keeping, complaint handling, corrective and preventive actions and internal auditing. The FDA enforces these requirements through periodic inspections of medical device manufacturers. These requirements are complex and technical and require substantial resources to remain compliant. Our failure or the failure of our suppliers to maintain compliance with the QSR requirements could result in the shutdown of our manufacturing operations or the recall of our products, which would have a material adverse effect on our business. In the event that 1 of our suppliers fails to maintain compliance with our quality requirements, we may have to qualify a new supplier and could experience manufacturing delays as a result. We also could be subject to injunctions, product seizures, or civil or criminal penalties. Medical Device Reporting. Medical Device Reporting ( MDR ) regulations require us to inform the FDA whenever information reasonably suggests that 1 of our devices may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or when 1 of our devices has malfuncti1d, if the device would be likely to cause or contribute to a death or a serious injury in the event the malfunction were to recur. Labeling and Promotion . Labeling and promotional activities are also subject to scrutiny by the FDA. Labeling includes not only the label on a device, but also includes any descriptive or informational literature that accompanies or is used to promote the device. Among other things, labeling violates the law if it is false or misleading in any respect or it fails to contain adequate directions for use. Moreover, product claims that are outside the labeling either approved or cleared by the FDA violate the FDCA. Allegations of off label promotion can result in enforcement action by both federal and state agencies, including the FDA, the Department of Justice, the Office of Inspector General of the Department of Health and Human Services, state attorneys general, as well as liability under the False Claims Act, discussed further below. Federal Trade Commission. Our product promotion is also subject to regulation by the Federal Trade Commission (the FTC ), which has primary oversight of the advertising of unrestricted devices. The Federal Trade Commission Act prohibits unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in or affecting commerce, as well as unfair or deceptive practices such as the dissemination of any false advertisement pertaining to medical devices. FTC enforcement can result in orders requiring, among other things, limits on advertising, corrective advertising, consumer redress, rescission of contracts and such other relief as the FTC may deem necessary. Import Requirements. To import a medical device into the United States, the importer must file an entry notice and bond with the United States Bureau of Customs and Border Protection ( CBP ). All devices are subject to FDA examination before release from the CBP. Any article that appears to be in violation of the FDCA may be refused admission and a notice of detention and hearing may be issued. If the FDA ultimately refuses admission, the CBP may issue a notice for redelivery and assess liquidated damages for up to 3 times the value of the lot. Export Requirements. Products for export from Europe and from the United States are subject to foreign countries' import requirements and the exporting requirements of the FDA or European regulating bodies, as applicable. In particular, international sales of medical devices manufactured in the United States that are not approved or cleared by the FDA for use in the United States, or are banned or deviate from lawful performance standards, are subject to FDA export requirements and we may not be able to export such products. 12 Table of Contents Foreign countries often require, among other things, an FDA certificate for products for export, also called a Certificate to Foreign Government. To obtain this certificate from the FDA, the device manufacturer must apply to the FDA. The FDA certifies that the product has been granted clearance or approval in the United States and that the manufacturing facilities were in compliance with the Quality Systems Regulation at the time of the last FDA inspection. Foreign Regulations. Medical device laws and regulations are also in effect in many countries outside of the United States. These laws and regulations vary significantly from country to country and range from comprehensive device approval requirements for some or all of our medical device products to more basic requests for product data or certification. The number and scope of these requirements are increasing. In particular, marketing of medical devices in the European Economic Area ( EEA ) is subject to compliance with European Medical Device Directives. Under this regime, a medical device may be placed on the market within the EEA if it conforms to certain essential requirements and bears the CE mark. The most fundamental essential requirement is that a medical device must be designed and manufactured in such a way that it will not compromise the clinical condition or safety of patients, or the safety and health of users and others. In addition, the device must achieve the performances intended by the manufacturer and be designed, manufactured and packaged in a suitable manner. Manufacturers must demonstrate that their devices conform to the relevant essential requirements through a conformity assessment procedure. The nature of the assessment depends upon the classification of the device. The classification rules are mainly based on 3 criteria the length of time the device is in contact with the body, the degree of invasiveness and the extent to which the device affects the anatomy. Conformity assessment procedures for all but the lowest risk classification of device involve a notified body. Notified bodies are often private entities and are authorized or licensed to perform such assessments by government authorities. Manufacturers usually have some flexibility to select conformity assessment procedures for a particular class of device and to reflect their circumstances, e.g., the likelihood that the manufacturer will make frequent modifications to its products. Conformity assessment procedures require an assessment of available clinical evidence, literature data for the product and post market experience in respect of similar products already marketed. Notified bodies also may review the manufacturer's quality systems. If satisfied that the product conforms to the relevant essential requirements, the notified body issues a certificate of conformity, which the manufacturer uses as a basis for its own declaration of conformity and application of the CE mark. Application of the CE mark allows the product to be distributed throughout the EEA. Failure to materially comply with applicable EEA or other foreign medical device laws and regulations would likely have a material adverse effect on our business. In addition, the European Commission is currently revising the legal framework for medical devices in the EEA. Approval of the new regulations is anticipated in 2014. If the current EEA and other foreign regulations regarding the manufacture and sale of medical devices change, the new regulations may impose additional obligations on medical device manufactures or otherwise have a material adverse effect on our business. Reimbursement. Our products are generally used in medical procedures covered by government or private health plans. In general, a third party payer covers a medical device or procedure only when the plan administrator is satisfied that the product or procedure is reasonable and necessary to the treatment of the patient. Some private payers in the U.S. and government payers in foreign countries may also condition payment on the cost effectiveness of the treatment. Even if a device has received clearance or approval for marketing by the FDA, there is no certainty that third party payers will reimburse patients for the cost of the device and related procedures. Even if coverage is available, third party payers may place restrictions on the circumstances in which they provide coverage or may offer reimbursement that is not sufficient to cover the cost of our products. If hospitals and physicians cannot obtain adequate reimbursement for our products or the procedures in which they are used, our business, financial condition, results of operations, and cash flows could suffer a material adverse impact. Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act. In March 2010, the U.S. Congress enacted legislation known as the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act ( PPACA ), which we anticipate will substantially change the way healthcare in the United States is financed by both governmental and private insurers and will significantly affect the medical device industry. This new law contains a number of provisions, including provisions governing enrollment in federal healthcare programs, reimbursement changes, the increased funding of comparative effectiveness research for use in healthcare decision making, and enhancements to fraud and abuse requirements and enforcement, that we believe will affect existing government healthcare programs and result in the development of new programs. The law imposes on medical device manufacturers a 23% excise tax on U.S. sales of certain medical devices, which has adversely affected our gross profit and earnings for our marketed products, and is expected to adversely affect our gross profit and earnings in the future. The PPACA also includes new reporting and disclosure requirements for device manufacturers with regard to payments or other transfers of value made to certain healthcare providers. The first report under these provisions will be due March 31, 2014 and will relate to payments or other transfers of value made between August 1 and December 31, 2013 Thereafter, annual reports 13 Table of Contents due in March will relate to payments or other transfers of value during the previous calendar year. Reports submitted under these new requirements will be placed in a public database. If we fail to provide these reports, or if the reports we provide are not accurate, we could be subject to significant penalties. In addition, developing the necessary systems to comply with the new reporting requirement could be financially burdensome. Several states have adopted similar reporting requirements. Anti Kickback Statutes. The Medicare and Medicaid Patient Protection Act of 1987, as amended, which is more commonly known as the federal healthcare Anti Kickback Statute, prohibits persons from, among other things, knowingly and willfully offering or paying remuneration, directly or indirectly, to a person to induce the purchase, order, lease, or recommendation of a good or service for which payment may be made in whole or part under a federal healthcare program such as Medicare or Medicaid, unless the arrangement fits within 1 of several safe harbors. The definition of remuneration has been broadly interpreted to include anything of value, including, for example, gifts, discounts, the furnishing of supplies or equipment, credit arrangements, payments of cash and waivers of payments. Several courts have interpreted the statute to mean that if any 1 purpose of an arrangement involving remuneration is to induce referrals or otherwise generate business involving goods or services reimbursed in whole or in part under federal healthcare programs, the statute has been violated. Violations can result in significant penalties, imprisonment and exclusion from Medicare, Medicaid and other federal healthcare programs. Exclusion of a manufacturer would preclude any federal healthcare program from paying for its products. In addition, kickback arrangements can provide the basis for an action under the Federal False Claims Act, which is discussed in more detail below. Recognizing that the Anti Kickback Statute is broad and may technically prohibit many innocuous or beneficial arrangements, the Office of Inspector General of Health and Human Services ( OIG ) issued a series of regulations, generally known as safe harbors. These safe harbors set forth provisions that, if all the applicable requirements are met, will ensure that healthcare providers and other parties will not be prosecuted under the Anti Kickback Statute. The failure of a transaction or arrangement to fit precisely within 1 or more safe harbors does not necessarily mean that it is illegal or that prosecution will be pursued. However, conduct and business arrangements that do not fully satisfy an applicable safe harbor may result in increased scrutiny by government enforcement authorities such as the OIG. Arrangements that implicate the Anti Kickback Statute, and that do not fall within a safe harbor, are analyzed by the OIG on a case by case basis. Government officials have focused recent enforcement efforts on the sales and marketing activities of pharmaceutical, medical device, and other healthcare companies, and recently have brought cases against individuals or entities that allegedly offered unlawful inducements to potential or existing customers in an attempt to procure their business. Settlements of these cases by healthcare companies have involved significant fines and or penalties and in some instances criminal pleas. In addition to the Federal Anti Kickback Statute, many states have their own anti kickback laws. Often, these laws closely follow the language of the federal law, although they do not always have the same exceptions or safe harbors. In some states, these anti kickback laws apply with respect to all payers, including commercial health insurance companies. False Claims Laws. Federal false claims laws prohibit any person from knowingly presenting, or causing to be presented, a false claim for payment to the federal government or knowingly making, or causing to be made, a false statement to get a false claim paid. Manufacturers can be held liable under false claims laws, even if they do not submit claims to the government, if they are found to have caused submission of false claims. Under the PPACA, a violation of the Anti Kickback Statute is deemed to be a violation of the Federal False Claims Act. The Federal False Claims Act also includes whistleblower provisions that allow private citizens to bring suit against an entity or individual on behalf of the United States and to recover a portion of any m1tary recovery. Many of the recent highly publicized settlements in the healthcare industry relating to sales and marketing practices have been cases brought under the False Claims Act. The majority of states also have adopted statutes or regulations similar to the federal false claims laws, which apply to Item and services reimbursed under Medicaid and other state programs. Sanctions under these federal and state laws may include civil m1tary penalties, exclusion of a manufacturer's products from reimbursement under government programs, criminal fines and imprisonment. Privacy and Security. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ( HIPAA ), the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (the HITECH Act ), and the rules promulgated thereunder, require certain entities, referred to as covered entities (including most healthcare providers and health plans), to comply with established standards, including standards regarding the privacy and security of protected health information ( PHI ). HIPAA further requires that covered entities enter into agreements meeting certain regulatory requirements with their business associates, as such term is defined by HIPAA, which, among other things, obligate the business associates to safeguard the covered entity's PHI against improper use and disclosure. In addition, a business associate may face significant statutory and contractual liability if the business associate breaches the agreement or causes the covered entity to fail to comply with HIPAA. In the course of our business operations, we have entered into several business associate agreements with certain of our customers that are covered entities. Pursuant to the terms of these business associate agreements, we have agreed, among other things, not to use or further disclose the covered entity's PHI except as permitted or required by the agreements or as required by law, to use reasonable administrative, physical, and 14 Table of Contents technical safeguards to prevent prohibited disclosure of such PHI and to report to the covered entity any unauthorized uses or disclosures of such PHI. Accordingly, we incur compliance related costs in meeting HIPAA related obligations under business associate agreements to which we are a party. Moreover, if we fail to meet our contractual obligations under such agreements, we may incur significant liability. In addition, HIPAA's criminal provisions potentially could be applied to a non covered entity that aided and abetted the violation of, or conspired to violate, HIPAA, although we are unable at this time to determine conclusively whether our actions could be subject to prosecution in the event of an impermissible disclosure of protected health information to us. Also, many state laws regulate the use and disclosure of health information and require notification in the event of breach of such information. Those state laws that are more protective of individually identifiable health information are not preempted by HIPAA. Finally, in the event we change our business model and become a HIPAA covered entity, we would be directly subject to a broader range of requirements under HIPAA, HITECH, the rules issued thereunder and their civil and criminal penalties. Environmental Regulations. We are subject to various federal, state, local and foreign laws and regulations relating to the protection of the environment, as well as public and worker health and safety. In the course of our business, we are involved in the handling, storage and disposal of certain chemicals. The laws and regulations applicable to our operations include provisions that regulate the release or discharge of hazardous or other regulated materials into the environment. Usually these environmental laws and regulations impose strict liability, rendering a person liable without regard to negligence or fault on the part of such person. Such environmental laws and regulations may expose us to liability for the conduct of, or conditions caused by, others, or for acts that were in compliance with all applicable laws at the time the acts were performed. To date, we have not been required to expend material amounts in connection with our efforts to comply with environmental requirements and currently do not believe that compliance with such requirements will have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Failure to comply with applicable environmental and related laws could have a material adverse effect on our business. Our operations are also subject to various laws and regulations relating to occupational health and safety. We maintain safety, training and maintenance programs as part of our ongoing efforts to ensure compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Compliance with applicable health and safety laws and regulations has required and continues to require substantial expenditures. Environmental, health and safety legislation and regulations change frequently. Changes in those regulations could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. EMPLOYEES As of December 31, 2013, we employed 2,888 people. AVAILABLE INFORMATION We file annual, quarterly and current reports and other information with the SEC. These materials can be inspected and copied at the SEC Public Reference Room at 100 F Street, NE, Washington, D.C. 20549. Copies of these materials may also be obtained by mail at prescribed rates from the SEC Public Reference Room at the above address. Information about the Public Reference Room can be obtained by calling the SEC at 1 800 SEC 0330. The SEC also maintains an Internet site that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers that file electronically with the SEC. The address of the SEC Internet website is www.sec.gov. We make available, free of charge, on our Internet website, located at www.merit.com, our most recent Annual Report on Form 10 K, our most recent Quarterly Reports on Form 10 Q, any Current Reports on Form 8 K filed since our most recent Annual Report on Form 10 K, and any amendments to such reports as soon as reasonably practicable following the electronic filing of such report with the SEC. In addition, we provide electronic or paper copies of such filings free of charge upon request. FINANCIAL INFORMATION ABOUT FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC SALES For financial information relating to our foreign and domestic sales see Note 12 to our consolidated financial statements set forth in Item 8 of this report. Item 1A. Risk Factors. Our business, operations and financial condition are subject to certain risks and uncertainties. Should 1 or more of these risks or uncertainties materialize, or should any underlying assumptions prove incorrect, our actual results will vary, and may vary materially, from those anticipated, estimated, projected or expected. Among the key factors that may have a direct bearing on our business, operations or financial condition are the factors identified below 15 Table of Contents We may be unable to protect our proprietary technology or our technology may infringe on the proprietary rights of others. We have obtained U.S. and foreign patents and filed applications for additional U.S. and foreign patents; however, there can be no assurance that any patents we hold, or for which we have applied, will provide us with any significant competitive advantages, that third parties will not challenge our patents, or that patents owned by others will not have an adverse effect on our ability to conduct business. We could incur substantial costs in preventing patent infringement, in curbing the unauthorized use of our proprietary technology by others, or in defending against similar claims of others. Since we rely on trade secrets and proprietary know how to maintain our competitive position, there can be no assurance that others may not independently develop similar or superior technologies. We operate in an increasingly competitive medical technology marketplace. There has also been substantial litigation regarding patent and other intellectual property rights in the medical device industry. Our activities may require us to defend against claims and actions alleging infringement of the intellectual rights of others. If a court rules against us in any patent litigation, any of several negative outcomes could occur we could be subject to significant liabilities, we could be forced to seek licenses from third parties, or we could be prevented from marketing certain products. Any of these outcomes could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition or operating results. We are, from time to time, involved in litigation, regulatory proceedings or other disputes. The outcomes of litigation are difficult to predict or quantify; however, an adverse outcome could limit our ability to sell certain products or reduce our operating margin on the sale of our products. The expense of defending litigation may be costly and the demands of litigation would divert our management's attention from the day to day operations of our business, which could adversely affect our business, results of operations or cash flows. In addition, an unfavorable outcome in litigation could negatively impact our business, results of operations or cash flows. Intellectual property infringement or other claims may be asserted against us in the future related to events not presently known to our management. Because we are self insured with respect to intellectual property infringement claims, a significant claim against us could have a material adverse effect on our financial position or results of operations. Our ability to remain competitive is dependent, in part, upon our ability to prevent other companies from using our proprietary technology incorporated into our products. We seek to protect our technology through a combination of patents, trademarks, and trade secrets, as well as licenses, proprietary know how and confidentiality agreements. We may be unable, however, to prevent others from using our proprietary information, or may be unable to continue to use such information for our own purposes, for numerous reasons, including the following, any of which could have an adverse effect on our business, operations, or financial condition Our issued patents may not be sufficiently broad to prevent others from copying our proprietary technology. Our issued patents may be challenged by third parties and deemed to be overbroad or unenforceable. Our products may infringe on the patents or other intellectual property rights of other parties, requiring us to alter or discontinue our manufacture or sale of such products. Costs associated with seeking enforcement of our patents against infringement or defending our activities against allegations of infringement, may be significant. Our pending patent applications may not be granted for various reasons, including over breadth or conflict with an existing patent. Other persons or entities may independently develop, or have developed, similar or superior technologies. All of our patents will eventually expire and some of our patents, including patents protecting significant elements of our technology, will expire within the next several years. Our products may be subject to product liability claims. Our products are used in connection with invasive procedures and in other medical contexts that entail an inherent risk of product liability claims. If medical personnel or their patients suffer injury in connection with the use of our products, whether as a result of a failure of our products to function as designed, an inappropriate design, inadequate disclosure of product related risks or information, improper use, or for any other reason, we could be subject to lawsuits seeking significant compensatory and punitive damages. We have previously faced claims by patients claiming injuries from our products. To date, these claims have not resulted in a material negative impact on our operations or financial condition; however, patients or customers may bring claims in a number of circumstances, including if our products were misused, if our products' manufacture or design was flawed, if our products produced unsatisfactory results, or if the instructions for use and other disclosure of product related risks for our products were found to be inadequate. The outcome of this type of personal injury litigation is difficult to assess or quantify. We maintain product liability insurance; however, there is no assurance that this coverage will be sufficient to satisfy any claim made against us. Moreover, any product liability claim brought against us could result in significant costs, could increase our product 16 Table of Contents liability insurance rates, or could prevent us from securing insurance coverage in the future. As a result, any product recall or lawsuit seeking significant m1tary damages may have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. In addition, the occurrence of such an event or claim could result in a recall of products from the market or a safety alert relating to such products. Such a recall could result in significant costs and could divert management's attention from our business. We generally offer a limited warranty for product returns which are due to defects in quality and workmanship. We attempt to estimate our potential liability for future product returns and establish reserves on our financial statements in amounts that we believe will be sufficient to address our warranty obligations; however, our actual liability for product returns may significantly exceed the amount of our reserves. If we underestimate our potential liability for future product returns, or if unanticipated events result in returns that exceed our historical experience, our financial condition and operating results could be materially and adversely affected. The agreements and instruments governing our debt contain restrictions and limitations that could significantly affect our ability to operate our business, as well as significantly affect our liquidity. We entered into an Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated December 19, 2012, with the lenders who are or may become party thereto (collectively, the Lenders ) and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association ( Wells Fargo ), as administrative agent for the Lenders, which was amended on October 4, 2013 by a First Amendment to Amended and Restated Credit Agreement (as amended, the Credit Agreement ). The Credit Agreement contains a number of significant covenants that could adversely affect our ability to operate our business, our liquidity or our results of operations. These covenants restrict, among other things, our incurrence of indebtedness, creation of liens or pledges on our assets, mergers or similar combinations or liquidations, asset dispositions, repurchases or redemptions of equity interests or debt, issuances of equity, payment of dividends and certain distributions, and entry into related party transactions. Our breach of any covenant in the Credit Agreement, not otherwise cured, waived or amended, could result in a default under the applicable debt obligations and could trigger acceleration of those obligations. Any default under the Credit Agreement could adversely affect our ability to service our debt and to fund our planned capital expenditures and ongoing operations. A significant adverse change in, or failure to comply with, governing regulations could adversely affect our business, operations or financial condition. Substantially all of our products are devices, as defined in the FDCA, and the manufacture, distribution, record keeping, labeling and advertisement of substantially all of our products are subject to regulation by the FDA in the United States and equivalent regulatory agencies in various foreign countries in which our products are manufactured, distributed, labeled, offered or sold. Further, we are subject to regular review and periodic inspections at our facilities with respect to compliance with the FDCA, QSR and similar requirements of foreign countries. Some physicians may be using our products in procedures that are not included in the clearance or approval of the products. If the FDA or any other foreign, federal or state enforcement agency were to conclude that we are not in compliance with applicable laws or regulations, or have improperly promoted our products for uncleared or unapproved indications, the FDA or such other agency could require a recall of products or allege that our promotional activities misbrand or adulterate our products or violate other legal requirements, which could result in investigations, prosecutions, or other civil or criminal actions. In addition, we are subject to certain export control restrictions administered by the U.S. Department of the Treasury and may be subject to regulations administered by other regulatory agencies in various foreign countries to which our products are exported. Although we believe we are currently in material compliance with these requirements, any failure on our part to comply with all applicable current and future regulations could adversely affect our business, operations, or financial condition. Recent healthcare reform legislation has negatively affected our financial results and may have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. The PPACA was enacted into law in March 2010. Effective January 1, 2014, most of the core pieces of the PPACA went into effect. Certain other provisions of the legislation are not scheduled to become effective for a number of years. There are many programs and requirements for which the details have not yet been fully established or consequences not fully understood, and it is unclear what the full impact of the legislation will be. The law imposes on medical device manufacturers a 23% excise tax on U.S. sales of certain medical devices. During the year ended December 31, 2013 we incurred $4.3 million related to this tax, which reduced our gross profit by 1%. In a ddition, the costs of compliance with the PPACA new reporting and disclosure requirements with regard to payments or other transfers of value made to healthcare providers may have a material, negative impact on our results of operations and our cash flows. We cannot predict what healthcare programs and regulations will be ultimately implemented 17 Table of Contents at the federal or state level, or the effect of any future legislation or regulation in the U.S. or internationally. However, any changes that lower reimbursements for our products or reduce medical procedure volumes could adversely affect our business and results of operations. As we cannot ultimately predict what will happen as the PPACA provisions begin to take effect, any changes to healthcare reform that lower reimbursement amounts for our products could adversely affect our revenues and results of operation and financial condition. The medical device industry is experiencing greater scrutiny and regulation by governmental authorities. Our medical devices and business activities are subject to rigorous regulation by the FDA and other federal, state and international governmental authorities. These authorities and members of Congress have been increasing their scrutiny over the medical device industry. In recent years, the U.S. Congress, Department of Justice, the Office of Inspector General of the Department of Health and Human Services, and the Department of Defense have issue d subpoenas and other requests for information to medical device manufacturers, primarily related to financial arrangements with healthcare providers, regulatory compliance and product promotional practices. We anticipate that the government will continue to scrutinize our industry closely, and that additional regulation by government authorities may increase compliance costs, exposure to litigation, and other adverse effects to our operations. We will be required to expend significant resources for research, development, testing and regulatory approval or clearance of our products under development and these products may not be developed successfully or approved for commercial use. Most of our products under development will require significant additional research, development, engineering and preclinical and or clinical testing, as well as regulatory approval or clearance and a commitment of significant additional resources prior to their commercialization. It is possible that they may not be developed successfully; be proven safe or effective in clinical trials; offer therapeutic or other improvements over current treatments and products; meet applicable regulatory standards or receive regulatory approvals or clearances; be capable of production in commercial quantities at acceptable costs and in compliance with regulatory requirements; be successfully marketed; or be covered by private or public insurers. We are currently conducting a clinical trial in an effort to obtain approval from the FDA to claim the use of the QuadraSphere Microspheres for the treatment of a specific disease or condition, such as the treatment of liver cancer in the United States. We are also currently conducting a clinical trial to obtain FDA approval to claim the use of our Embosphere Microspheres for the indication of prostate artery embolization. European Union regulations do not currently require such an application for these classes of medical device. In order for us to obtain FDA approval or clearance to promote the use of QuadraSphere Microspheres and the Embosphere Microspheres for the purposes indicated in our clinical trials, we will need to complete those trials and submit positive clinical data to the FDA. If we cannot enroll study subjects in sufficient numbers to complete the necessary studies, if there is a disruption in the supply of materials for the trials or if any other factors preclude us from completing the trials in a timely manner we will likely not be able to complete those trials. Even if we complete either or both clinical trials, the FDA may require us to undertake additional testing, or the trial results may not be sufficient to obtain FDA approval for other reasons. If we do not obtain FDA approval of the product use claimed in a clinical trial, we will not be able to promote the subject product for the indicated treatment of the specific disease or condition in the United States. Potential reforms to the FDA 510(k) process could adversely affect our business, operations, or financial condition. In August 2010, the FDA issued its preliminary recommendations on reform of the 510(k) premarket notification process for medical devices. On January 19, 2011, the FDA announced its Plan of Action for implementing these recommendations. The Plan of Action included 25 action Item, including revising existing guidance or developing guidance to clarify various aspects of the 510(k) process and to streamline the review process for innovative, lower risk products (the de novo process); improving training for the Center for Devices and Radiological Health ( CDRH ) staff and industry; increasing reliance on external experts; and addressing and improving internal processes. The FDA has already begun implementing many of these reforms, and may implement other reforms in the future, which could have the effect of making it more difficult and expensive for us to obtain 510(k) clearance. Limits on reimbursement imposed by governmental and other programs may adversely affect our business. The cost of a significant portion of medical care is funded by governmental, and other third party insurance programs. Limits on reimbursement imposed by such programs may adversely affect the ability of hospitals and others to purchase our products. In addition, limitations on reimbursement for procedures which utilize our products could adversely affect our business. 18 Table of Contents We are subject to laws targeting fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry, the violation of which could adversely affect our business or financial results. Our operations are subject to various state and federal laws targeting fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry, including the federal Anti Kickback Statute and other anti kickback laws, which prohibit any person from knowingly and willfully offering, paying, soliciting or receiving remuneration, directly or indirectly, to induce or reward either the referral of an individual, or the furnishing or arranging for an item or service, for which payment may be made under federal healthcare programs, such as the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Violations of these fraud and abuse related laws are punishable by criminal or civil sanctions, including substantial fines, imprisonment and exclusion from participation in healthcare programs such as Medicare and Medicaid, any of which could adversely affect our business or financial results. Jurisdictions outside the United States may also have laws, including anti bribery statutes, prohibiting similar conduct and providing for significant penalties. If our employees or agents violate the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act or anti bribery laws in other jurisdictions, we may incur fines or penalties, or experience other adverse consequences. We are subject to the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act ( FCPA ) and similar anti bribery laws in non U.S. jurisdictions. The FCPA generally prohibits companies and their intermediaries from illegally offering things of value to non U.S. government officials for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. As we continue to expand our business activities internationally, compliance with the FCPA and other anti bribery laws presents greater challengers to our operations. If our employees or agents violate the provisions of the FCPA or other anti bribery laws, we may incur fines or penalties, which could have a material adverse effect on our operating results or financial condition. Increases in the price of commodity comp1nts, particularly petroleum based products, or loss of supply could have an adverse effect on our business. Many of our products have comp1nts that are manufactured using resins, plastics and other petroleum based materials. Our ability to operate profitably is dependent, in large part, on the availability and pricing of these materials. The availability of these products is affected by a variety of factors beyond our control, including political uncertainty in the Middle East, and there is no assurance that crude oil supplies will not be interrupted in the future. Any such interruption could have an adverse effect on our ability to produce, or on the cost to produce, our products. Also, crude oil prices generally fluctuate based on a number of factors beyond our control, including changes in supply and demand, general economic conditions, labor costs, fuel related transportation costs, competition, import duties, tariffs, currency exchange rates and political uncertainty in the Middle East. Our suppliers may pass some of their cost increases on to us, and if such increased costs are sustained or increase further, our suppliers may pass further cost increases on to us. In addition to the effect on resin prices, transportation costs generally increase based on the effect of higher crude oil prices, and these increased transportation costs may be passed on to us. Our ability to recover such increased costs may depend upon our ability to raise prices on our products. Due to the highly competitive nature of the healthcare industry and the cost containment efforts of our customers and third party payors, we may be unable to pass along cost increases through higher prices. If we are unable to fully recover these costs through price increases or offset these increases through cost reductions, we could experience lower margins and profitability, and results of operations, financial condition and cash flows could be materially and adversely affected. Economic and industry conditions constantly change, and negative economic conditions in the United States and other countries could materially and adversely affect our business and results of operations. Our business and our results of operation are affected by many changing economic, industry and other conditions beyond our control. Actual or potential changes in international, national, regional and local economic, business and financial conditions, including recession and inflation, may negatively affect consumer preferences, perceptions, spending patterns or demographic trends, any of which could adversely affect our business or results of operations. We may also experience higher bad debt rates and slower receivable collection rates in our dealings with our customers. In addition, disruptions in the credit markets have previously resulted, and could again result, in volatility, decreased liquidity, widening of credit spreads, and reduced availability of financing. There can be no assurance that future financing will be available to us on acceptable terms, if at all. An inability to obtain necessary additional financing on acceptable terms may have an adverse impact on us and on our ability to implement our business plan. Termination or interruption of relationships with our suppliers, or failure of such suppliers to perform, could disrupt our business. We rely on raw materials, comp1nt parts, finished products and services supplied by third parties in connection with our business. For example, substantially all of our products are sterilized by only a few different entities. In addition, some of our 19 Table of Contents products are manufactured or assembled by third parties. If a supplier of significant raw materials, comp1nt parts, finished goods or services were to terminate its relationship with us, or otherwise cease supplying raw materials, comp1nt parts, finished goods or services consistent with past practice, our ability to meet our obligations to our end customers may be disrupted. A disruption with respect to numerous products, or with respect to a few significant products, could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We are currently engaged in litigation regarding the termination of our rights under a Purchasing Agreement we executed with Specialized Health Products, Inc., a medical device manufacturer which was subsequently acquired by Bard Access Systems, Inc. If we are unsuccessful in that litigation, our ability to market products which are the subject of that Purchasing Agreement would be terminated. If we are unable to sell those products, and incorporate them into other products and kits that we sell, our operating and financial results may be negatively affected. We may also incur significant expenses in the course of conducting the litigation. We may be unable to successfully manage growth, particularly if accomplished through acquisitions. Successful implementation of our business strategy will require that we effectively manage any associated growth. To manage growth effectively, our management will need to continue to implement changes in certain aspects of our business, to improve our information systems and operations to respond to increased demand, to attract and retain qualified personnel, and to develop, train, and manage an increasing number of management level and other employees. Growth could place an increasing strain on our management, financial, product design, marketing, distribution and other resources, and we could experience operating difficulties. Any failure to manage growth effectively could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We have recently completed a series of significant acquisitions, including our acquisition of BioSphere and Thomas Medical. As we grow through acquisitions, we face the additional challenges of integrating the operations, culture, information management systems and other characteristics of the acquired entity with our own. We have incurred, and will likely continue to incur, significant expenses in connection with negotiating and consummating various acquisition transactions, and we may inherit significant liabilities in connection with prospective acquisitions. In addition, we may not realize competitive advantages, synergies or other benefits anticipated in connection with any such acquisition. If we do not adequately identify targets for, or manage issues related to, our future acquisitions, such acquisitions may have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates may negatively impact our financial results. As our operations have grown outside the United States, we have also become subject to market risk relating to foreign currency. Those fluctuations could have a negative impact on our margins and financial results. For example, during 2013, the exchange rate between all applicable foreign currencies and the U.S. Dollar resulted in an increase in our gross revenues of approximately $859,000. For the year ended December 31, 2013, approximately $79.4 million, or 18%, of our sales, were denominated in foreign currencies. If the rate of exchange between foreign currencies decline against the U.S. Dollar, we may not be able to increase the prices we charge our customers for products whose prices are denominated in those respective foreign currencies. Furthermore, we may be unable or elect not to enter into hedging transactions which could mitigate the effect of declining exchange rates. As a result, if the rate of exchange between foreign currencies declines against the U.S. Dollar, our financial results may be negatively impacted. We depend on generating sufficient cash flow to fund our debt obligations, capital expenditures, and ongoing operations. We are dependent on our cash on hand and free cash flow to fund our debt obligations, capital expenditures and ongoing operations. Our ability to service our debt and to fund our planned capital expenditures and ongoing operations will depend on our ability to continue to generate cash flow. If we are unable to generate sufficient cash flow or we are unable to access additional liquidity sources, we may not be able to service or repay our debt, operate our business, respond to competitive challenges, or fund our other liquidity and capital needs. A significant portion of our revenues is derived from a few products, procedures and or customers. A significant portion of our revenues is attributable to sales of our inflation devices. During the year ended December 31, 2013, sales of our inflation devices (including inflation devices sold in custom kits and through OEM channels) accounted for 20 Table of Contents approximately 15% of our total revenues. Any material decline in market demand, or change in OEM supplier preference, for our inflation devices could have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. In addition, the products that have accounted for a majority of our historical revenues are designed for use in connection with a few related medical procedures, including angioplasty, stent placement procedures, and spinal procedures. If subsequent developments in medical technology or drug therapy make such procedures obsolete, or alter the methodology of such procedures so as to eliminate the usefulness of our products, we may experience a material decrease in demand for our products and experience deteriorating financial performance. We may be unable to compete in our markets, particularly if there is a significant change in relevant practices or technology. The markets in which our products compete are highly competitive. We face competition from many companies which are larger, better established, have greater financial, technical and other resources and possess a greater market presence than we do. Such resources and market presence may enable our competition to more effectively market competing products or to market competing products at reduced prices in order to gain market share. In addition, our ability to compete successfully is dependent, in part, upon our response to changes in technology and upon our efforts to develop and market new products which achieve significant market acceptance. Competing companies with substantially greater resources than us are actively engaged in research and development of new methods, treatments, drugs, and procedures to treat or prevent cardiovascular disease that could limit the market for our products and eventually make some of our products obsolete. A reduction in the demand for a significant number of our products, or a few key products, could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. The market price of our Common Stock has been, and may continue to be, volatile. The market price of our Common Stock has at times been, and may in the future be, volatile for various reasons, including those discussed in these risks factors, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. Other events that could cause volatility in our stock, include without limitation, quarter to quarter variances in our financial results; analysts and other projections or recommendations regarding our Common Stock specifically or medical technology stocks generally; any restatement of our financial statements or any investigation of us by the SEC, the FDA or another regulatory authority; or a decline, or rise, of stock prices in the capital markets generally. Operations at our manufacturing facilities may be negatively impacted by certain factors, including severe weather conditions and natural disasters. Our operations could be affected by many factors beyond our control, including severe weather conditions and natural disasters, including hurricanes and tornadoes. These conditions could cause substantial damage to our facilities, interrupt our production and disrupt our ability to deliver products to our customers. Our operations in Angleton, Texas have been suspended due to hurricanes in recent years. In September 2008, we shut down our operations in Angleton in anticipation of Hurricane Ike. While we incurred minimal damage to our facility, we experienced greater financial damage as a result of the production disruption. Although our insurance proceeds covered some of the losses associated with the event, future natural disasters could increase the cost of insurance. We cannot be certain that any losses from business interruption or property damage, along with potential increases in insurance costs, will not have a material adverse effect on our results of operations or financial condition. We are dependent upon key personnel. Our success is dependent on key management personnel, including Fred P. Lampropoulos, our Chairman of the Board, President and Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Lampropoulos is not subject to any agreement prohibiting his departure, and we do not maintain key man life insurance on his life. The loss of Mr. Lampropoulos, or of certain other key management personnel, could have a materially adverse effect on our business and operations. Our success also depends on, among other factors, the successful recruitment and retention of key operating, manufacturing, sales and other personnel. We are subject to work stoppage, transportation and related risks. We manufacture products at various locations in the United States and foreign countries and sell our products worldwide. We depend on third party transportation companies to deliver supplies necessary to manufacture our products from vendors to our various facilities and to move our products to customers, operating divisions, and other subsidiaries located worldwide. Our 21 Table of Contents manufacturing operations, and the operations of the transportation companies on which we depend, may be adversely affected by natural disasters or significant human events, such as a war, terrorist attack, riot, strike, slowdown or similar event. Any disruption in our manufacturing or transportation could materially and adversely affect our ability to meet customer demands or our operations. International economic conditions could adversely affect our business and results of operations. Over the last several years we have expanded our business globally, and have become increasingly subject to the risks arising from adverse changes in global economic conditions. Recent currency devaluations in South America and India have affected our sales growth in these regions. There can be no assurance that there will not be further deterioration in global or regional economies. Our customers may experience financial difficulties or be unable to borrow m1y to fund their operations, which may adversely impact their ability or decision to purchase or pay for our products. The strength and timing of any economic recovery remains uncertain, and we cannot predict to what extent the global economic slowdown may negatively impact our results of operation or financial condition. Our failure to comply with applicable environmental laws and regulations could affect our business, operations or financial condition. We manufacture and assemble certain products that require the use of hazardous materials that are subject to various national, federal, state and local laws and regulations governing the protection of the environment, health and safety. While the cost of compliance with such laws and regulations has not had a material adverse effect on our results of operations historically, compliance with future regulations may require additional capital investments. Additionally, because we use hazardous and other regulated materials in our manufacturing processes, we are subject to certain risks of future liabilities, lawsuits and claims resulting from any substances we manufacture, dispose of or release. Any accidental release may have an adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition. We cannot predict what additional environmental, health and safety legislation or regulations will be enacted or become effective in the future or how existing or future laws or regulations will be administered or interpreted with respect to our operations, capital expenditures, results of operations or competitive position. Compliance with more stringent laws or regulations or adverse changes in the interpretation of existing laws or regulations by government agencies could have a material adverse effect on our business, operations or financial condition, and could require substantial expenditures. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments. N1 Item 2 Item 2 Properties.
